Indiana, session 2026, SB245.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-2-2-14.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JUNE
27, 2024 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 14.1. (a) The following definitions
apply throughout this section:
(1) "Manager or supervisor" means any employee:
(A) whose primary duty is managing the enterprise or a
customarily recognized department or subdivision of the
enterprise;
(B) who customarily and regularly directs the work of two
(2) or more other full-time employees or their equivalent;
and
(C) who has the authority to hire or fire other employees,
or whose suggestions and recommendations as to the hiring
or firing are given particular weight.
The term includes a business owner who owns at least a bona
fide twenty percent (20%) equity interest in the enterprise in
which the owner is employed and who is actively engaged in
its management.
(2) "Nontipped employee" means a person employed in an
occupation in which the person does not customarily and
regularly receive tips, such as a dishwasher, cook, or janitor.
The term does not include a manager or supervisor, even if
SEA 245

2
the manager or supervisor would otherwise be considered a
tipped or nontipped employee.
(3) "Tip" means a sum presented to an employee by a
customer as a gift or gratuity in recognition of some service
performed, directly or indirectly, for the customer. The term
does not include a mandatory service charge.
(4) "Tipped employee" means a person employed in an
occupation in which the person customarily and regularly
receives tips, such as a waiter, bellhop, counter server (who
serves customers), busser, barback, food runner, hostess,
bartender, or a service bartender. The term does not include
a manager or supervisor, even if the manager or supervisor
would otherwise be considered a tipped or nontipped
employee.
(5) "Tip pooling arrangement" means a system in which tips
received by an employee are shared with other eligible
employees.
(b) An employer may require a tip pooling arrangement under
the following circumstances:
(1) An employer may require a tipped employee to participate
in a tip pooling arrangement if the tips are shared only with
other tipped employees, and with no nontipped employees. An
employer that implements a tip pooling arrangement must
notify tipped employees of any required tip pool contribution
amount, may only take a tip credit for tips each employee
ultimately receives, and may not retain any of the employees'
tips for any other purpose.
(2) If the employer pays its employees at least the minimum
wage, the employer may require a tipped employee to
participate in a tip pooling arrangement where the tips are
shared with other tipped and nontipped employees. An
employer that implements a tip pooling arrangement must
notify employees of any required tip pool contribution amount
and may not retain any of the employees' tips for any other
purpose.
Under no circumstances may an employer receive tips from a tip
pooling arrangement or permit a manager or supervisor to receive
tips from a tip pooling arrangement.
(c) For purposes of determining whether a person is employed
in an occupation in which the person customarily and regularly
receives tips (as used in the definition of "tipped employee" under
subsection (a)), the trier of fact shall consider the effect a person's
SEA 245

3
job duties, efficiency, and service have on a customer's willingness
and tendency to tip. A customer's willingness and tendency to tip
may be affected by a person's work that directly supports or is
itself the service function for which a customer would tip,
regardless of whether the person personally performs the service
function. Direct customer interaction is not a requisite or a
determinative factor.
(d) The general assembly intends for this section to apply
retroactively to remedy a legal issue that arose following Loper
Bright Enterprises v. Raimondo, 603 U.S. 369 (2024), handed down
on June 28, 2024.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
SEA 245

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 245